Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 2. Decedent’s Estate or Terminating Income Interest.

§ 64.2-1004.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.5; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1005.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.6; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.